Montana, session 2025, HB883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Coordination -- reduction to supreme court budget. (1) If both [this
act] and a general appropriations act are passed and approved, and the general appropriations act provides an
appropriation to the judicial branch for the state supreme court for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, then
the appropriation for the state supreme court in the general appropriations act is $18 million.
(2) If both [this act] and any act that appropriates funds to the state supreme court are passed and
approved, then the appropriations in those acts to the state supreme court are void.
(3) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, appropriations and appropriation authority to district
court functions may not be transferred to the state supreme court or used for any state supreme court functions.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 883